Washington statutes.
RCW 26.28.030

Contracts of minors—Disaffirmance.

A minor is bound, not only by contracts for necessaries, but also by his or her other contracts, unless he or she disaffirms them within a reasonable time after he or she attains his or her majority, and restores to the other party all money and property received by him or her by virtue of the contract, and remaining within his or her control at any time after his or her attaining his or her majority.

[ 2011 c 336 s 694; 1866 p 92 s 2; RRS s 5829.]